Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$3,985,666 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Board of
Licensed Professional Counselors and Therapists.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,788,602 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Oregon Board of
Psychology.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Enrolled House Bill 5024 (HB 5024-A) Page 1
Passed by House May 24, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5024 (HB 5024-A) Page 2